Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5428
Agent violation; notice; hearing.

If the director finds that any utilization review agent doing business in this state is engaging in any violation of the Utilization Review Act and that a proceeding in respect thereto would be in the public interest, he or she shall issue and serve upon such utilization review agent a statement of the charges in that respect and a notice of hearing thereon, which notice shall set a hearing date not less than ten days after the date of the notice.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 13.